Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.085

Pension on death before or after retirement—Surviving spouse not formerly covered—"Surviving spouse" defined.

Whenever any member of the police department of any such city shall die, or shall have heretofore died, or whenever any such member who has been heretofore retired or who is hereafter retired for length of service or a disability, shall have died, or shall die, leaving a surviving spouse or child or children under the age of eighteen years, upon satisfactory proof of such facts made to it, the board shall order and direct that a pension equal to one-third of the amount of salary at any time hereafter attached to the position held by such member in the police department at the time of his or her death or retirement, not to exceed one-third of the salary of captain, shall be paid to the surviving spouse during the surviving spouse's life, and in addition, to the child or children, until they are eighteen years of age, as follows: For one child, one-eighth of the salary on which such pension is based; for two children, a total of one-seventh of said salary; and for three or more children, a total of one-sixth of said salary: PROVIDED, If such spouse or child or children marry, the person so marrying shall receive no further pension from the fund. In case there is no surviving spouse, or if the surviving spouse shall die, the child or children shall be entitled to the spouse's share in addition to the share specified herein until they reach eighteen years of age. No spouse shall be entitled to any payments on the death of a retired officer unless such surviving spouse has been married to such officer for a period of at least five years prior to the date of his or her retirement.

As of April 25, 1973, a surviving spouse not otherwise covered by the provisions of section 2, chapter 78, Laws of 1959, shall be entitled to a pension of three hundred dollars per month.

"Surviving spouse" as used in this section means surviving female or male spouse.

[ 2012 c 117 s 27; 1973 1st ex.s. c 181 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 26; 1961 c 140 s 1; 1959 c 78 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.